District of Columbia statutes.
50-2607

Deposit of fees and moneys into General Fund.

All moneys derived from the sale or assignment of any property, real or personal, shall be deposited in the Local Transportation Fund as established by § 9-111.01a.

Feb. 16, 1942, 56 Stat. 93, ch. 76, § 7
Dec. 16, 1944, 58 Stat. 809, ch. 595, § 3
Mar. 2, 1962, 76 Stat. 18, Pub. L. 87-408, § 601
Jan. 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-42, § 3(c), 22 DCR 6312
Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-175, § 4(e), 53 DCR 6499
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 627, 58 DCR 1008
District of Columbia General Fund, see § 50-2603.
This section is referenced in § 50-2603.
1981 Ed., § 40-809.
1973 Ed., § 40-808.
D.C. Law 16-175 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “All fees and other moneys collected under this subchapter, including all fees collected pursuant to §§ 50-2632 and 50-2633, and all moneys derived from the sale or assignment of any property, real or personal, shall be deposited in the General Fund of the District of Columbia as established by the Revenue Funds Availability Act of 1975.”
D.C. Law 18-370 substituted “Local Transportation Fund” for “Local Roads Construction and Maintenance Fund”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 627 of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).
Section 629 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided: “Sec. 629. Applicability. This subtitle shall apply as of October 1, 2011; except, that sections 622 and 623(a)(2) shall apply as of the effective date of this act.”